nb: Gridenhet: Dobbel (imperial + metrisk); Imperial (tommer); Metrisk (centimeter/millimeter); Ingen trykt rutenett/skala; Annet
en: Grid unit: Dual (imperial + metric); Imperial (inches); Metric (centimeters/millimeters); No printed grid/scale; Other
bg-BG: Мрежова единица: Двойна (имперска + метрична); Имперска (инчове); Метрична (сантиметри/милиметри); Без отпечатана мрежа/скала; Друго
fi: Ruudukon mittajärjestelmä: Kaksiosainen (brittiläinen ja metrinen); Brittiläinen (tuumat); Metrinen (senttimetrit/millimetrit); Ei painettua ruudukkoa/asteikkoa; Muu
vi: Đơn vị lưới: Kép (hệ Anh + hệ mét); Hệ Anh (inch); Hệ mét (centimet/milimet); Không in lưới/thước đo; Khác
nl: Rastereenheid: Dubbel (imperiaal + metrisch); Imperiaal (inch); Metrisch (centimeter/millimeter); Geen afgedrukt raster/schaal; Overig
it: Unità Grid: Doppio (imperiale + metrico); Imperiale (pollici); Metrico (centimetri/millimetri); Nessuna griglia/scala stampata; Altro
de: Maßeinheit des Rasters: Dual (imperial + metrisch); Imperial (Zoll); Metrisch (Zentimeter/Millimeter); Ohne aufgedrucktes Raster/Skala; Sonstige
zh-TW: 網格單位: 雙制 (英制 + 公制); 英制 (英吋); 公制 (公分/公釐); 無列印網格/比例尺; 其他
pl: Jednostka siatki: Podwójna (imperialna + metryczna); Imperialna (cale); Metryczna (centymetry/milimetry); Brak nadrukowanej siatki/skali; Inne
pt-PT: Unidade Grid: Duplo (imperial e métrico); Imperial (polegadas); Métrico (centímetros/milímetros); Sem grelha/escala impressa; Outra
ru: Единица измерения сетки: Двойная (британская и метрическая); Британская (дюймы); Метрическая (сантиметры/миллиметры); Без напечатанной сетки/шкалы; Другое
sv: Rutnätsenhet: Dubbel (imperial och metrisk); Imperial (tum); Metrisk (centimeter/millimeter); Inget tryckt rutnät/skala; Övrigt
fr: Unité de mesure de la grille: Double (impérial + métrique); Impérial (pouces); Métrique (centimètres/millimètres); Aucune grille/échelle imprimée; Autre
cs: Měřítko: Kombinované (imperiální a metrické); Imperiální (palce); Metrické (centimetry/milimetry); Bez natištěné mřížky/měřítka; Ostatní
ja: Gridユニット: デュアル (ヤード・ポンド法 + メートル法); ヤード・ポンド法 (インチ); メートル法 (センチメートル/ミリメートル); グリッド/スケール印字なし; その他
hr-HR: Jedinica mreže: Dvostruko (imperijalno i metričko); Imperijalno (inči); Metričko (centimetri/milimetri); Bez otisnute mreže / mjerila; Ostalo
hu: Rácsegység: Kettős (angolszász + metrikus); Angolszász (hüvelyk); Metrikus (centiméter/milliméter); Nincs nyomtatott rács/skála; Egyéb
es: Unidad de cuadrícula: Dual (imperial + métrico); Imperial (pulgadas); Métrico (centímetros/milímetros); Sin cuadrícula/escala impresa; Otro
ko: 격자 단위: 혼합(야드파운드법 + 미터법); 야드파운드법(인치); 미터법(센티미터/밀리미터); 인쇄된 그리드/눈금 없음; 기타
sk-SK: Jednotka mriežky: Kombinované (imperiálne + metrické); Imperiálne (palce); Metrické (centimetre/milimetre); Bez vytlačenej mriežky/mierky; Iné
zh-CN: 网格单位: 双单位（英制 + 公制）; 英制（英寸）; 公制（厘米/毫米）; 无印刷网格/刻度; 其他
th: หน่วย Grid: ระบบคู่ (อิมพีเรียล + เมตริก); ระบบอิมพีเรียล (นิ้ว); ระบบเมตริก (เซนติเมตร/มิลลิเมตร); ไม่มีตาราง/มาตราส่วนพิมพ์ลาย; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Grid unidade: Duplo (imperial e métrico); Imperial (polegadas); Métrico (centímetros/milímetros); Sem grade/escala impressa; Outro
sl-SI: Enota mreže: Dvojna (imperialna in metrična); Imperialna (palci); Metrična (centimetri/milimetri); Brez natisnjene mreže/merila; Drugo
ro-RO: Unitatea de grilă: Dual (imperial + metric); Imperial (inchi); Metric (centimetri/milimetri); Fără grilă/scară imprimată; Altele
tr: Izgara ünitesi: İkili (İngiliz + metrik); İngiliz (inç); Metrik (santimetre/milimetre); Basılı ızgara/ölçek yok; Diğer
lt-LT: Tinklelio vienetas: Dviguba (imperinė + metrinė); Imperinė (coliai); Metrinė (centimetrai / milimetrai); Be atspausdinto tinklelio / skalės; Kita
da: Gitterenhed: Dobbelt (imperial + metrisk); Imperial (tommer); Metrisk (centimeter/millimeter); Intet trykt gitter/skala; Andet
el: Μονάδα πλέγματος: Διπλό (αυτοκρατορικό + μετρικό); Αυτοκρατορικό (ίντσες); Μετρικό (εκατοστά/χιλιοστά); Χωρίς τυπωμένο πλέγμα/κλίμακα; Άλλο